District of Columbia statutes.
50-704

Commercial vehicle restrictions.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the following vehicles are exempt from the purchase requirements contained in this chapter:

(1)

Any vehicle more than 26,000 pounds GVWR;

(2)

Emergency or law enforcement vehicles;

(3)

Nonroad vehicles, including farm and construction vehicles;

(4)

Vehicles in fleets operating in the covered area with fewer than 10 vehicles;

(5)

Vehicles in a covered fleet not capable of being centrally fueled;

(6)

Vehicles which are garaged under normal operations at a personal residence;

(7)

Vehicles leased or rented to the general public;

(8)

New car demonstration vehicles; and

(9)

Vehicles used for product demonstrations and tests.

(b)

The fact that one or more vehicles in a fleet is not centrally fueled does not exempt an entire fleet from the purchase requirements contained in this chapter.

History

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-243, § 5, 38 DCR 355
Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-201, § 2(d), 41 DCR 7178

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-702.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-2004.